Utah statutes.
20A-7-602.   Local referendum process -- Application procedures.
(1)  Persons wishing to circulate a referendum petition shall file an
application with the local clerk.
(2)  The application shall contain:
(a)  the name and residence address of at least five sponsors of the
referendum petition;
(b)  a certification indicating that each of the sponsors:
(i)  is a resident of Utah; and
(ii) (A)  if the referendum challenges a county ordinance, has voted in a
regular general election in Utah within the last three years; or
(B)  if the referendum challenges a municipal ordinance, has voted in a
regular municipal election in Utah within the last three years;
(c)  the signature of each of the sponsors, attested to by a notary public;
and
(d) one copy of the law.
